Utah statutes.
4-39-207.   Inspection of facilities.
(1)  The department may conduct pathological or physical investigations at any
domesticated elk facility to ensure compliance with this chapter.
(2)  For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and rules
promulgated under this chapter and, at any reasonable time during regular
business hours, the department shall have free and unimpeded access to inspect
all buildings, yards, pens, pastures, and other areas in which any
domesticated elk are kept, handled, or transported.
(3)  The department shall notify the Division of Wildlife Resources prior to
an inspection so that a Division of Wildlife Resources representative may be
present at the inspection.
